Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 10. Dissolution and Liquidation.

Sec. 06.26.730.
Voluntary liquidation.

Without department approval, a trust company may not cease acting as a fiduciary in this state and voluntarily surrender its certificate of authority and as a consequence be relieved of the necessity to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

A trust company proposing to cease acting as a fiduciary in this state shall submit to the department

a certified copy of a resolution of the trust company’s board of directors reflecting the board’s decision that the trust company should cease acting as a fiduciary in this state; and

the trust company’s plan adopted by its board for winding up its fiduciary operations in this state.

The department may approve or disapprove the trust company’s plan for winding up its fiduciary operations in this state based on the department’s evaluation of whether the plan provides adequate protection for those persons and interests for whom the trust company acts as a fiduciary. The department’s approval may be subject to any condition the department determines appropriate under the circumstances.

During the implementation of a trust company’s plan for winding up its fiduciary operations in this state, the department retains the authority to supervise the trust company and may conduct any examination relating to either the trust company or the plan for winding up that the department considers necessary or appropriate.

If the department has reason to conclude that the trust company is not safely or expeditiously implementing the approved plan for winding up the trust company’s fiduciary operations in this state, the department may

begin revocation proceedings under AS

06.26.740

;

take possession of the trust company’s trust business in this state in the same manner, with the same effect, and subject to the same rights accorded to the trust company under AS

06.26.750

.

The department shall cancel the trust company’s certificate of authority if the department approves the trust company’s plan for winding up its fiduciary operations in this state and if all of the following conditions that apply to the trust company have been met:

the trust company has completed its plan for winding up its fiduciary operations in this state consistent with any conditions that the department imposed on the plan under (c) of this section;

the trust company has been relieved under all applicable laws of all duties as trustee, executor, administrator, registrar of stocks and bonds, or any other type of fiduciary position under court, private, or other appointment that the trust company had accepted;

if the trust company has its principal place of business in this state, the trust company has, under all applicable laws, wound up its fiduciary operations in each of the other jurisdictions where the trust company solicited appointment or served as a fiduciary, or otherwise acted as a fiduciary;

if the trust company has its principal place of business in this state and is not authorized to engage in activities other than acting as a fiduciary, the trust company is being liquidated under AS

06.26.760

—

06.26.800

.

Upon the department’s canceling the trust company’s certificate of authority, the trust company may not without obtaining a new certificate of authority act as a fiduciary in this state, or in any jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.740.
Revocation.

If the department determines that any of the following factors exist, the department may revoke, consistent with AS

06.01.030

and regulations adopted by the department under AS

06.01.030

and this chapter, a trust company’s certificate of authority:

the existence of the trust company, or its authority to act as a fiduciary, has been terminated or suspended under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction in which the trust company is organized;

the trust company’s authority to act as fiduciary has been terminated or suspended under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction in which the trust company is organized, or its license to act as a fiduciary has been terminated or suspended under the laws of any other jurisdiction in which the trust company had been authorized to act as a fiduciary;

a receiver, liquidator, or conservator has been appointed for the trust company under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction in which the trust company is organized, or for its operation in any other jurisdiction in which the trust company operates;

the trust company is violating or has violated or the department has reasonable cause to believe is about to violate

a law or regulation;

a condition imposed by the department in writing in connection with approving an application or notice under this chapter or granting any other request of the trust company under this chapter;

a written agreement that the trust company entered into with the department;

a cease and desist order issued by the department under AS 06.01.030;

the trust company is engaging in or has engaged in, or the department has reasonable cause to believe the trust company is about to engage in an unsafe or unsound practice;

the trust company has ceased to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business, is incapable of paying its debts as they mature, has liabilities in excess of its assets, or is subject to or has applied for an adjudication in bankruptcy, reorganization, or other relief under any bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, or moratorium law;

the trust company has ceased to act as a fiduciary in this state;

the trust company has failed to pay any fees, charges, forfeitures, penalties, or other payment due to the department under this title.

If the department has reasonable cause to believe any of the factors identified in (a) of this section is true, and if the department determines it is necessary to protect the persons and interests in this state for whom the trust company acts as a fiduciary or to protect the property in this state to which the trust company holds title as a fiduciary or in which the trust company holds an interest as a fiduciary, the department may immediately suspend the trust company’s certificate of authority.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.750.
Authority to take possession.

If the department revokes a trust company’s certificate of authority under AS

06.26.740(a)

, the department may take possession of the trust company’s fiduciary operations in this state and may appoint a receiver for the liquidation of the trust company’s fiduciary operations in this state. If the trust company has its principal place of business in this state, the department may take possession of, and appoint a receiver for the liquidation of all the trust company’s fiduciary operations wherever they are conducted.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.760.
Department in possession.

When the department has taken possession of a trust company, it is vested with the full and exclusive power of management and control, including the power to act as a trustee for trust assets, to continue or discontinue the operation of the trust company, to stop or limit the payment of the trust company’s obligations, to employ necessary assistants, to execute an instrument in the name of the trust company, to commence, defend, and conduct in the trust company’s name any action or proceeding to which the trust company may be a party, to terminate the possession by restoring the trust company to its board, and to reorganize or liquidate the trust company under this chapter. As soon as practicable after taking possession, the department shall make an inventory of the trust assets and the trust company assets and file a copy of the inventory with the superior court.

When the department has taken possession, the following dates are postponed until six months after the possession begins:

notwithstanding other provisions of law, the date on which any period of limitation fixed by a statute or agreement would otherwise expire on a claim or right of action of the trust company; or

the date on which an appeal must be taken or a pleading or other document must be filed by the trust company in any pending court action or other proceeding.

A judgment, lien, or attachment may not be enforced against trust company assets while the assets are in possession of the department. Upon the election of the department in connection with a liquidation or reorganization,

any lien or attachment, other than an attorney’s or mechanic’s lien, obtained upon a trust company asset during the department’s possession or within four months before beginning that possession may be vacated, except liens created by the department while in possession; and

any transfer of trust company assets made after or in contemplation of the trust company’s insolvency or in anticipation of the department’s takeover, with intent to effect a preference of one creditor over another creditor or to prevent the distribution of the trust company assets according to law, is void.

The department may borrow money in the name of the trust company in the department’s possession and may pledge trust company assets as security for the loan.

All necessary and reasonable expenses resulting from the department’s possession of a trust company and of its reorganization or liquidation shall be paid from trust company assets.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For the effect of paragraph (b)(2) on Rules 6 and 12, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 40, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure, and Rules 204, 403, 502, 602, and 611, Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure, see § 9(b), ch. 77, SLA 2002, in the 2002 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For ownership, see 3 AAC 4, art. 4.

Sec. 06.26.770.
Reorganization.

If the department decides to reorganize a trust company, the department, after providing an opportunity for a hearing to all interested parties, shall enter an order proposing a reorganization plan. The department shall send a copy of the plan to each depositor and other customers and to each creditor who will not receive payment of a claim in full under the plan and a notice that, unless within 30 days the plan is disapproved in writing by persons holding one-third or more of the aggregate amount of the claims, the department will reorganize the trust company.

A plan of reorganization may not be established under this chapter unless, in the opinion of the department,

the plan is fair to all classes of depositors, other customers, creditors, and shareholders;

subject to a fair adjustment for new capital that a class will pay under the plan, the face amount of the trust company asset interest provided to a class of depositors, other customers, creditors, or shareholders under the plan does not exceed the value of the assets at liquidation less the full amount of the claims of all prior classes;

the plan provides for the issuance of common stock in an amount that will provide an adequate ratio to deposits;

any exchange of new common stock for obligations or stock of the trust company will be made

in the inverse order of the priorities in liquidation of the classes that will retain an interest in the trust company; and

upon terms that adjust in a fair manner any change in the relative interest of the respective classes that will be produced by the exchange;

the plan assures the removal of a director, an officer, or an employee responsible for a problem identified by the department, including an unsafe, unsound, or unlawful action or the existence of an unsafe or unsound condition;

any merger or consolidation provided by the plan complies with this chapter.

When in the course of reorganization, supervening conditions render a plan of reorganization unfair or its execution impractical, the department may modify the plan or liquidate the trust company.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For ownership, see 3 AAC 4, art. 4.

Sec. 06.26.780.
Involuntary liquidation powers.

When liquidating a trust company, the department may exercise any power incidental to liquidating a trust company, but it may not, without the approval of the superior court,

sell trust company assets having an appraised value in excess of $100,000;

compromise or release a claim that exceeds $100,000 exclusive of interest;

make full payment on a claim, other than a claim upon an obligation incurred by the department, before preparing and filing a schedule of the department’s determinations under AS

06.26.790(d)(3)

.

Within six months after beginning the liquidation of a trust company, the department may terminate an executory contract for services or advertising to which the trust company is a party or an obligation of the trust company as a lessee. A lessor who receives 60 days’ notice of the department’s decision to terminate a lease does not have a claim for rent other than rent accrued to the date of termination or for damages due to the termination.

As soon as practical after beginning the involuntary liquidation of a trust company, the department shall take the steps necessary to terminate all fiduciary positions held by the trust company, to surrender all property held by the trust company as a fiduciary, and to settle the trust accounts of the trust company.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.790.
Claims.

As soon as practical after beginning the liquidation of a trust company, the department shall

mail a notice of the liquidation proceedings to the last known post office address of each depositor, creditor, lessee of a safe deposit box, bailor of property, and trustor and beneficiary of trust assets held by the trust company;

post a notice of the proceedings conspicuously on the premises of the trust company; and

publish a notice that the department determines to be appropriate for the proceedings.

The department shall mail with the notice sent under (a)(1) of this section a statement of the amount shown on the trust company’s records to be the claim of the depositor or creditor. The notice must also include a demand that a person who is entitled to property held by the trust company as bailee or trustee or in a safe deposit box of the trust company withdraw the property within 30 days. The notice must direct those depositors and creditors who claim amounts different from the amounts in the notice to file their claims with the trust company under the procedure described in the notice and before a specified date. The specified day may not be less than 60 days from the date of the first publication of the notice.

A safe deposit box whose contents have not been removed within 30 days after demand shall be opened. The department shall retain the contents of the box and the other unclaimed property held by the trust company as bailee until the conclusion of the liquidation proceedings. At the conclusion of the liquidation proceedings under this section, the property held by the department under this subsection is considered abandoned, and the department shall deliver the property to the Department of Revenue under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

.

Within six months after the last day specified in the notice for the filing of claims, or within a longer period if allowed by the superior court, the department shall

reject a claim that it determines to be invalid;

determine the amount, if any, owing to each known creditor or depositor and the priority class of the person’s claim under this chapter;

prepare a schedule of its determinations for filing in the superior court;

publish a notice in a newspaper once each week for three successive weeks, of the times and places where the schedule of determinations will be available for inspection and the date when the department will file its schedule in court; the date may not be sooner than 30 days after the first publication.

Within 30 days after the filing with the superior court of the department’s schedule under (d)(3) of this section, a creditor, depositor, or stockholder may file with the court an objection to a determination. The court shall hear and determine the filed objections after the notice to the department and interested claimants that the court establishes. If the court sustains an objection, the court shall direct that the schedule be modified appropriately.

After filing its schedule, the department may make partial distribution to the holders of the claims that are undisputed or are allowed by the court if an adequate reserve is established for the payment of disputed claims. As soon as practicable after the determination of all objections, the department shall make the final distribution.

The following claims have priority in liquidation proceedings, in the order listed:

obligations incurred by the department in liquidating the trust company;

wages and salaries of officers and employees earned during the three-month period preceding the department’s possession in an amount not exceeding $3,000 for each person;

fees and assessments owed by the trust company to the department;

deposits;

claims secured by trust company assets.

After the payment of all other claims, including interest at the rate of 10.5 percent a year, the department shall pay claims that are otherwise valid but that were not filed within the time prescribed.

If the sum available for a class of creditors is insufficient to provide payment in full, the sum shall be distributed pro rata to the claimants in the class.

Unclaimed property remaining after the completion of the liquidation proceedings under this section is presumed abandoned, and the property shall be delivered to the Department of Revenue for handling under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

.

After payment of the expenses of the liquidation and the claims against the trust company arising from its fiduciary obligations in this state under AS

06.26.760

—

06.26.800

, the receiver shall distribute any remaining money or other assets from the liquidation of the trust company’s fiduciary operations in this state equitably among, as applicable, the receivers for liquidation of the trust company’s fiduciary operations in other states of the United States and under the laws of the United States, for payment of the expenses of liquidation and claims against the trust company’s fiduciary operations. If the trust company’s fiduciary operations are not being liquidated in another state or under the laws of the United States, the receiver shall, after satisfying the requirements of AS

06.26.760

—

06.26.800

, pay any remaining money or other assets from the liquidation of the trust company’s fiduciary operations in this state to the trust company.

When the receiver has completed the liquidation of the trust company’s fiduciary operations in this state, the receiver shall, with notice to the department, petition the court for an order declaring the trust company’s fiduciary operations in this state properly wound up under AS

06.26.760

—

06.26.800

. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall proceed as provided in AS

06.26.760

—

06.26.800

.

An order issued by the court under a petition filed under (l) of this section may only declare the trust company’s fiduciary operations in this state have been properly wound up and may not declare the trust company is dissolved. The court may make whatever additional orders and grant whatever additional relief that the court determines is proper under the evidence submitted.

After an order is issued under (m) of this section declaring the trust company’s fiduciary operations in this state are properly wound up,

the trust company shall, except for any further winding up, cease acting as a fiduciary in this state or in any jurisdiction; and

the receiver shall promptly file with the department a copy of the order certified by the clerk of the court.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.800.
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation as receiver or liquidator.

The department may appoint the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor as receiver for a trust company that the department has taken possession of if the deposits of the trust company are insured by that corporation or its successor. Upon filing with the court a certificate indicating the acceptance of the appointment by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor, the possession of and title to all the assets, business, and property of the trust company are transferred to that corporation. The department is then relieved of all responsibility and liability with respect to the reorganization or liquidation of the trust company. The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor may liquidate, reorganize, merge, or consolidate the trust company in the manner permitted by the laws of the United States or by this chapter, and possesses all the rights, powers, duties, and obligations of the department in the liquidation, reorganization, merger, or consolidation of the trust company under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)